California statutes. Insurance Code
(i) “RBC Instructions” means the RBC Report, including risk-based capital instructions adopted by the NAIC, and as the RBC Instructions may be amended by the NAIC from time to time in accordance with the procedures adopted by the NAIC.

(j) “RBC Level” means an insurer’s Company Action Level RBC, Regulatory Action Level RBC, Authorized Control Level RBC, or Mandatory Control Level RBC where:

(1) “Company Action Level RBC” means, with respect to any insurer, the product of 2.0 and its Authorized Control Level RBC.

(2) “Regulatory Action Level RBC” means the product of 1.5 and its Authorized Control Level RBC.

(3) “Authorized Control Level RBC” means the number determined under the risk-based capital formula in accordance with the RBC Instructions.

(4) “Mandatory Control Level RBC” means the product of .70 and the Authorized Control Level RBC.

(k) “RBC Plan” means a comprehensive financial plan containing the elements specified in subdivision (b) of Section 739.3. If the commissioner rejects the RBC Plan, and it is revised by the insurer, with or without the commissioner’s recommendation, the plan shall be called the “Revised RBC Plan.”

(l) “RBC Report” means the report required in Section 739.2.

(m) “Total Adjusted Capital” means the sum of:

(1) An insurer’s statutory capital and surplus.

(2) Other items, if any, that the RBC Instructions may provide.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 321, Sec. 4.   (AB 1391)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

739.2.

(a) Every domestic insurer shall, on or prior to each March 15 (the “filing date”), prepare and submit to the commissioner a report of its RBC Levels as of the end of the calendar year just ended, in a form and containing such information as is required by the RBC Instructions. In addition, every domestic insurer shall file its RBC Report:

(1) With the NAIC in accordance with the RBC Instructions.

(2) With the insurance commissioner in any state in which the insurer is authorized to do business, if the insurance commissioner has notified the insurer of its request in writing, in which case the insurer shall file its RBC Report not later than the later of:

(A) Fifteen days from the receipt of notice to file its RBC Report with that state.

(B) The filing date.

(b) A life or health insurer’s RBC shall be determined in accordance with the formula set forth in the RBC Instructions. The formula shall take into account, and may adjust for the covariance between, the following:

(1) The risk with respect to the insurer’s assets.

(2) The risk of adverse insurance experience with respect to the insurer’s liabilities and obligations.

(3) The interest rate risk with respect to the insurer’s business.

(4) All other business risks and such other relevant risks as are set forth in the RBC Instructions.

In each case, these shall be determined by applying the factors in the manner set forth in the RBC Instructions.

(c) A property and casualty insurer’s RBC shall be determined in accordance with the formula set forth in the RBC Instructions. The formula shall take into account and may adjust for the covariance between the following:

(1) Asset risk.

(2) Credit risk.

(3) Underwriting risk.

(4) All other business risks and any other relevant risks as are set forth in the RBC Instructions.

(d) An excess of capital over the amount produced by the risk-based capital requirements contained in this article and the formulas, schedules, and instructions referenced in this article is desirable in the business of insurance. Accordingly, insurers shall seek to maintain capital above the RBC levels required by this article. Additional capital is used and useful in the insurance business and helps to secure an insurer against various risks inherent in, or affecting, the business of insurance and not accounted for or only partially measured by the risk-based capital requirements contained in this article.

(e) If a domestic insurer files an RBC Report that in the judgment of the commissioner is inaccurate, then the commissioner shall adjust the RBC Report to correct the inaccuracy and shall notify the insurer of the adjustment. The notice shall contain a statement of the reason for the adjustment. An RBC Report as so adjusted is referred to as an Adjusted RBC Report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 708, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

739.3.

(a) “Company Action Level Event” means any of the following events:

(1) The filing of an RBC Report by an insurer that indicates any of the following:

(A) The insurer’s Total Adjusted Capital is greater than or equal to its Regulatory Action Level RBC but less than its Company Action Level RBC.

(B) If a life or health insurer, the insurer has Total Adjusted Capital that is greater than or equal to its Company Action Level RBC but less than the product of its Authorized Control Level RBC and 3.0, and has a negative trend.

(C) If a
 property and casualty insurer, the insurer has Total Adjusted Capital that is greater than or equal to its Company Action Level RBC but less than the product of its Authorized Control Level RBC and 3.0, and triggers the trend test determined in accordance with the trend test calculation included in the Property and Casualty RBC instructions.

(2) The notification by the commissioner to the insurer of an Adjusted RBC Report that indicates the event in paragraph (1), provided that the insurer does not challenge the Adjusted RBC Report under Section 739.7.

(3) If the insurer challenges, under Section 739.7, an Adjusted RBC Report that indicates the event in paragraph (1), the notification by the commissioner to the insurer that the commissioner has, after a hearing, rejected the insurer’s challenge.

(b) In the event of a
 Company Action Level Event, the insurer shall prepare and submit to the commissioner a comprehensive financial plan that shall do all of the following:

(1) Identify the conditions in the insurer that contribute to the Company Action Level Event.

(2) Contain proposals of corrective actions that the insurer intends to take and would be expected to result in the elimination of the Company Action Level Event.

(3) Provide projections of the insurer’s financial results in the current year and at least the four succeeding years, both in the absence of proposed corrective actions and giving effect to the proposed corrective actions, including projections of statutory operating income, net income, capital, or surplus, or a combination. The projections for both new and renewal business may include separate projections for each
 major line of business and separately identify each significant income, expense, and benefit component.

(4) Identify the key assumptions impacting the insurer’s projections and the sensitivity of the projections to the assumptions.

(5) Identify the quality of, and problems associated with, the insurer’s business, including, but not limited to, its assets, anticipated business growth and associated surplus strain, extraordinary exposure to risk, mix of business, and use of reinsurance in each case, if any.

(c) The RBC Plan shall be submitted as follows:

(1) Within 45 days of the Company Action Level Event.

(2) If the insurer challenges an Adjusted RBC Report pursuant to Section 739.7,
 within 45 days after notification to the insurer that the commissioner has, after a hearing, rejected the insurer’s challenge.

(d) Within 60 days after the submission by an insurer of an RBC Plan to the commissioner, the commissioner shall notify the insurer whether the RBC Plan shall be implemented or is, in the judgment of the commissioner, unsatisfactory. If the commissioner determines that the RBC Plan is unsatisfactory, the notification to the insurer shall set forth the reasons for the determination, and may set forth proposed revisions that will render the RBC Plan satisfactory, in the judgment of the commissioner. Upon notification from the commissioner, the insurer shall prepare a Revised RBC Plan, which may incorporate by reference revisions proposed by the commissioner, and shall submit the Revised RBC Plan to the commissioner as follows:

(1) Within 45 days after the
 notification from the commissioner.

(2) If the insurer challenges the notification from the commissioner under Section 739.7, within 45 days after a notification to the insurer that the commissioner has, after a hearing, rejected the insurer’s challenge.

(e) In the event of a notification by the commissioner to an insurer that the insurer’s RBC Plan or Revised RBC Plan is unsatisfactory, the commissioner may, at his or her discretion, subject to the insurer’s right to a hearing under Section 739.7, specify in the notification that the notification constitutes a Regulatory Action Level Event.

(f) Every domestic insurer that files an RBC Plan or Revised RBC Plan with the commissioner shall file a copy of the RBC Plan or Revised RBC Plan with the insurance commissioner in any state in which the insurer is authorized to
 do business if both of the following apply:

(1) That state has an RBC provision substantially similar to subdivision (a) of Section 739.8.

(2) The insurance commissioner of that state has notified the insurer of its request for the filing in writing, in which case the insurer shall file a copy of the RBC Plan or Revised RBC Plan in that state no later than the later of:

(A) Fifteen days after the receipt of notice to file a copy of its RBC Plan or Revised RBC Plan with the state.

(B) The date on which the RBC Plan or Revised RBC Plan is filed under subdivision (c) of Section 739.7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 348, Sec. 3.   (AB 1515)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

739.4.

(a) “Regulatory Action Level Event” means, with respect to any insurer, any of the following events:

(1) The filing of an RBC Report by the insurer that indicates that the insurer’s Total Adjusted Capital is greater than or equal to its Authorized Control Level RBC but less than its Regulatory Action Level RBC.

(2) The notification by the commissioner to an insurer of an Adjusted RBC Report that indicates the event in paragraph (1), provided the insurer does not challenge the Adjusted RBC Report under Section 739.7.

(3) If the insurer challenges an Adjusted RBC Report that indicates the event in paragraph (1) under Section 739.7, the notification by the commissioner to the insurer that the commissioner has, after a hearing, rejected the insurer’s challenge.

(4) The failure of the insurer to file an RBC Report by the filing date, unless the insurer has provided an explanation for such failure that is satisfactory to the commissioner and has cured the failure within 10 days after the filing date.

(5) The failure of the insurer to submit an RBC Plan to the commissioner within the time period set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 739.3.

(6) Notification by the commissioner to the insurer of the following:

(A) The RBC Plan or revised RBC Plan submitted by the insurer is, in the judgment of the commissioner, unsatisfactory.

(B) That notification constitutes a Regulatory Action Level Event with respect to the insurer, provided the insurer has not challenged the determination under Section 739.7.

(7) If the insurer challenges a determination by the commissioner under paragraph (6) pursuant to Section 739.7, the notification by the commissioner to the insurer that the commissioner has, after a hearing, rejected such challenge.

(8) Notification by the commissioner to the insurer that the insurer has failed to adhere to its RBC Plan or Revised RBC Plan, but only if such failure has a substantial adverse effect on the ability of the insurer to eliminate the Regulatory Action Level Event in accordance with its RBC Plan or Revised RBC Plan and the commissioner has so stated in the notification, provided the insurer has not challenged the determination under Section 739.7.

(9) If the insurer challenges a determination by the commissioner under paragraph (8) pursuant to Section 739.7, the notification by the commissioner to the insurer that the commissioner has, after a hearing, rejected the challenge, unless the failure of the insurer to adhere to its RBC Plan or Revised RBC Plan has no substantial adverse effect on the ability of the insurer to eliminate the Regulatory Action Level Event with respect to the insurer.

(b) In the event of a Regulatory Action Level Event the commissioner shall do all of the following:

(1) Require the insurer to prepare and submit an RBC Plan or, if applicable, a Revised RBC Plan.

(2) Perform such examination or analysis as the commissioner deems necessary of the assets, liabilities, and operations of the insurer, including a review of its RBC Plan or Revised RBC Plan.

(3) Subsequent to the examination or analysis, issue a corrective order specifying such corrective actions as the commissioner shall determine are required.

(c) In determining corrective actions, the commissioner may take into account such factors as are deemed relevant with respect to the insurer based upon the commissioner’s examination or analysis of the assets, liabilities, and operations of the insurer, including, but not limited to, the results of any sensitivity tests undertaken pursuant to the RBC Instructions. The RBC Plan or Revised RBC Plan shall be submitted as follows:

(1) Within 45 days after the occurrence of the Regulatory Action Level Event.

(2) If the insurer challenges an Adjusted RBC Report pursuant to Section 739.7 and the challenge is not in the judgment of the commissioner frivolous, within 45 days after the notification to the insurer that the commissioner has, after a hearing, rejected the insurer’s challenge.

(3) If the insurer challenges a Revised RBC Plan under Section 739.7, within 45 days after notification to the insurer that the commissioner has, after a hearing, rejected the insurer’s challenge.

(d) The commissioner may retain actuaries and investment experts and other consultants as may be necessary in the judgment of the commissioner to review the insurer’s RBC Plan or Revised RBC Plan, examine or analyze the assets, liabilities, and operations of the insurer and formulate the Corrective Order with respect to the insurer. The fees, costs, and expenses relating to consultants shall be borne by the affected insurer or such other party as directed by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 708, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

739.5.

(a) “Authorized Control Level Event” means any of the following events:

(1) The filing of an RBC Report by the insurer that indicates that the insurer’s Total Adjusted Capital is greater than or equal to its Mandatory Control Level RBC but less than its Authorized Control Level RBC.

(2) The notification by the commissioner to the insurer of an Adjusted RBC Report that indicates the event in paragraph (1), provided the insurer does not challenge the Adjusted RBC Report under Section 739.7.

(3) If the insurer challenges an Adjusted RBC Report that indicates the event in paragraph (1) under Section 739.7, notification by the commissioner to the insurer that the commissioner has, after a hearing, rejected the insurer’s challenge.

(4) The failure of the insurer to respond, in a manner satisfactory to the commissioner, to a Corrective Order, provided the insurer has not challenged the Corrective Order under Section 739.7.

(5) If the insurer has challenged a Corrective Order under Section 739.7 and the commissioner has, after a hearing, rejected the challenge or modified the Corrective Order, the failure of the insurer to respond, in a manner satisfactory to the commissioner, to the Corrective Order subsequent to rejection or modification by the commissioner.

(b) In the event of an Authorized Control Level Event with respect to an insurer, the commissioner shall do the following:

(1) Take such actions as are required under Section 739.4 regarding an insurer with respect to which a Regulatory Action Level Event has occurred.

(2) If the commissioner deems it to be in the best interests of the policyholders and creditors of the insurer and of the public, take such actions as are necessary to cause the insurer to be placed under regulatory control under Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010), Article 14.3 (commencing with Section 1064.1), Article 14.5 (commencing with Section 1065.1), and Article 15.5 (commencing with Section 1077). In the event the commissioner takes those actions, the Authorized Control Level Event shall be deemed sufficient grounds for the commissioner to take that action, and the commissioner shall have the rights, powers, and duties with respect to the insurer as are set forth in those provisions. In the event the commissioner takes actions under this paragraph pursuant to an Adjusted RBC Report, the insurer shall be entitled to such protections as are afforded to insurers under the provisions pertaining to summary proceedings.

(c) In the event of an Authorized Control Level Event with respect to the State Compensation Insurance Fund, the commissioner shall also issue a report to the Governor, the President pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the Assembly setting forth the conditions that exist.

(d) Upon a determination of the commissioner that an Authorized Control Level Event has occurred, the Governor, in consultation with the Legislature, may replace the President of the State Compensation Insurance Fund and appoint a recovery administrator. The recovery administrator shall be responsible for developing a plan of recovery for the State Compensation Insurance Fund, and for implementing the plan. The recovery administrator shall be a person who, through professional credentials or job experience, or both, has a demonstrated understanding of insurance law, insurer finances, experience in the rehabilitation of insurance companies, claims administration, and any other factors as are needed to create and execute a plan of recovery. The cost of the recovery administrator shall be borne by the State Compensation Insurance Fund. The administration shall remain until the commissioner conveys to the Governor his or her opinion that the fund has improved its finances to the extent that it is no longer at the Authorized Control Level or above, at which point the Governor may dismiss the recovery administrator and appoint a new President of the State Compensation Insurance Fund. During the time that the recovery administrator is acting, the board of the State Compensation Insurance Fund shall act in an advisory capacity to the recovery administrator and the Governor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 740, Sec. 3.5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

739.6.

(a) “Mandatory Control Level Event” means any of the following events:

(1) The filing of an RBC Report that indicates that the insurer’s Total Adjusted Capital is less than its Mandatory Control Level RBC.

(2) Notification by the commissioner to the insurer of an Adjusted RBC Report that indicates the event in paragraph (1), provided the insurer does not challenge the Adjusted RBC Report under Section 739.7.

(3) If the insurer challenges an Adjusted RBC Report that indicates the event in paragraph (1) under Section 739.7, notification by the commissioner to the insurer that the commissioner has, after a hearing, rejected the insurer’s challenge.

(b) (1) With respect to a life or health insurer, in the event of a Mandatory Control Level Event, the commissioner shall take actions as are necessary to cause the insurer to be placed under regulatory control under Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010), Article 14.3 (commencing with Section 1064.1), Article 14.5 (commencing with Section 1065.1), and Article 15.5 (commencing with Section 1077). In that event, the Mandatory Control Level Event shall be deemed sufficient grounds for the commissioner to take action under those acts, and the commissioner shall have the rights, powers, and duties with respect to the insurer as are set forth therein. In the event the commissioner takes actions pursuant to an Adjusted RBC Report, the insurer shall be entitled to protections as are afforded to insurers under those provisions. Notwithstanding any of the foregoing, the commissioner may forego action for up to 90 days after the Mandatory Control Level Event if he or she finds there is a reasonable expectation that the Mandatory Control Level Event may be eliminated within the 90-day period.

(2) With respect to a property and casualty insurer, the commissioner shall take those actions as are necessary to place the insurer under regulatory control, or, in the case of an insurer which is writing no business and that is running-off its existing business, may allow the insurer to continue its runoff under the supervision of the commissioner. In either event, the Mandatory Control Level Event shall be deemed sufficient grounds for the commissioner to take action and the commissioner shall have the rights, powers, and duties with respect to the insurer as are set forth in Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010). If the commissioner takes actions pursuant to an Adjusted RBC Report, the insurer shall be entitled to the protections of Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010) pertaining to summary proceedings. Notwithstanding any of the foregoing, the commissioner may forego action for up to 90 days after the Mandatory Control Level Event if the commissioner finds there is a reasonable expectation that the Mandatory Control Level Event may be eliminated within the 90-day period.

(3) In the event of a Mandatory Control Level Event with respect to the State Compensation Insurance Fund, the commissioner shall also issue a report to the Governor, the President pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the Assembly setting forth the conditions that exist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 740, Sec. 3.6.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

739.7.

Upon any of the events described in subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d), the insurer shall have the right to a departmental hearing, on the record, at which the insurer may challenge any determination or action by the commissioner. The insurer shall notify the commissioner of its request for a hearing within five days after the notification by the commissioner under subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d). Upon receipt of the insurer’s request for a hearing, the commissioner shall set a date for the hearing, which date shall be no less than 10 nor more than 30 days after the date of the insurer’s request.

(a) Notification to an insurer by the commissioner of an Adjusted RBC Report.

(b) Notification to an insurer by the commissioner that:

(1) The insurer’s RBC Plan or Revised RBC Plan is unsatisfactory.

(2) That notification constitutes a Regulatory Action Level Event with respect to the insurer.

(c) Notification to any insurer by the commissioner that the insurer has failed to adhere to its RBC Plan or Revised RBC Plan and that such failure has a substantial adverse effect on the ability of the insurer to eliminate the Company Action Level Event with respect to the insurer in accordance with its RBC Plan or Revised RBC Plan.

(d) Notification to an insurer by the commissioner of a Corrective Order with respect to the insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 708, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

739.8.

(a) All RBC Reports, to the extent the information within those reports is not required to be set forth in a publicly available annual statement schedule, and RBC Plans, including the results or report of any examination or analysis of an insurer performed pursuant to those plans, and any Corrective Order issued by the commissioner pursuant to examination or analysis, with respect to any domestic insurer or foreign insurer, that are filed with the commissioner constitute information that might be damaging to the insurer if made available to its competitors, and therefore shall be kept confidential by the commissioner. This information shall not be made public or be subject to subpoena, other than by the commissioner and then only for the purpose of enforcement actions taken by the commissioner pursuant to this chapter or any other provision of the insurance laws of this state.

(b) It is the judgment of the Legislature that the comparison of an insurer’s Total Adjusted Capital to any of its RBC Levels is a regulatory tool that may indicate the need for possible corrective action with respect to the insurer, and is not intended as a means to rank insurers generally. Therefore, except as otherwise required under this article, the making, publishing, disseminating, circulating, or placing before the public, or causing, directly or indirectly, to be made, published, disseminated, circulated, or placed before the public, in a newspaper, magazine, or other publication, or in the form of a notice, circular, pamphlet, letter, or poster, or over any radio or television station, or in any other way, an advertisement, announcement, or statement containing an assertion, representation, or statement with regard to the RBC Levels of any insurer, or of any component derived in the calculation, by any insurer, agent, broker, or other person engaged in any manner in the insurance business would be misleading and is therefore prohibited; provided, however, that if any materially false statement with respect to the comparison regarding an insurer’s Total Adjusted Capital to its RBC Levels (or any of them) or an inappropriate comparison of any other amount to the insurers’ RBC Levels is published in any written publication and the insurer is able to demonstrate to the commissioner with substantial proof the falsity of such statement, or the inappropriateness, as the case may be, then the insurer may publish an announcement in a written publication if the sole purpose of the announcement is to rebut the materially false statement.

(c) It is the further judgment of the Legislature that the RBC Instructions, RBC Reports, Adjusted RBC Reports, RBC Plans, and Revised RBC Plans are intended solely for use by the commissioner in monitoring the solvency of insurers and the need for possible corrective action with respect to insurers, and shall not be used by the commissioner for ratemaking nor considered or introduced as evidence in any rate proceeding, nor used by the commissioner to calculate or derive any elements of an appropriate premium level or rate of return for any line of insurance that an insurer or any affiliate is authorized to write. This subdivision does not affect the validity of any action taken before its effective date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 708, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

739.9.

(a) The provisions of this article are supplemental to any other provisions of the laws of this state, and shall not preclude or limit any other powers or duties of the commissioner under such laws.

(b) The commissioner may adopt reasonable rules necessary for the implementation of this article.

(c) The commissioner may exempt from the application of this article any domestic property and casualty insurer that does all of the following:

(1) Writes direct business only in this state.

(2) Writes direct annual premiums of five million dollars ($5,000,000) or less.

(3) Assumes no reinsurance in excess of 5 percent of direct premiums written.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 708, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

739.10.

(a) Any foreign insurer shall, upon the written request of the commissioner, submit to the commissioner an RBC Report as of the end of the calendar year just ended the later of:

(1) The date an RBC Report would be required to be filed by a domestic insurer under this chapter.

(2) Fifteen days after the request is received by the foreign insurer.

Any foreign insurer shall, at the written request of the commissioner, promptly submit to the commissioner a copy of any RBC Plan that is filed with the insurance commissioner of any other state.

(b) In the event of a Company Action Level Event or Regulatory Action Level Event with respect to any foreign insurer as determined under the RBC statute applicable in the state of domicile of the insurer, or, if no RBC provision is in force in that state, under the provisions of this chapter, if the insurance commissioner of the state of domicile of the foreign insurer fails to require the foreign insurer to file an RBC Plan in the manner specified under the RBC statute, or, if no RBC provision is in force in the state, under Section 739.3, the commissioner may require the foreign insurer to file an RBC Plan with the commissioner. In such event, the failure of the foreign insurer to file an RBC Plan with the commissioner shall be grounds to order the insurer to cease and desist from writing new insurance business in this state.

(c) In the event of a Mandatory Control Level Event with respect to any foreign insurer, if no domiciliary receiver has been appointed with respect to the foreign insurer under the rehabilitation and liquidation statute applicable in the state of domicile of the foreign insurer, the commissioner may make application to the superior court with respect to the liquidation of property of foreign insurers found in this state, and the occurrence of the Mandatory Control Level Event shall be considered adequate grounds for the application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 708, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

739.11.

If any provision of this article, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, such determination shall not affect the provisions or applications of this article that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to that end the provisions of this article are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 708, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

739.12.

(a) All notices by the commissioner to an insurer that may result in regulatory action hereunder shall be effective upon dispatch if transmitted by registered or certified mail, or in the case of any other transmission shall be effective upon the insurer’s receipt of such notice.

(b) Copies of all notices from the commissioner to the State Compensation Insurance Fund under this article shall be sent to the Governor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 740, Sec. 3.7.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Special Provisions Regarding Health Coverage [740. - 742.1.]

740.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and except as provided herein, any person or other entity that provides coverage in this state for medical, surgical, chiropractic, physical therapy, speech pathology, audiology, professional mental health, dental, hospital, or optometric expenses, whether the coverage is by direct payment, reimbursement, or otherwise, shall be presumed to be subject to the jurisdiction of the department unless the person or other entity shows that while providing the services it is subject to the jurisdiction of another agency of this or another state or the federal government.

(b) A person or entity may show that it is subject to the jurisdiction of another agency of this or another state or the federal government by providing to the commissioner the appropriate certificate or license issued by the other governmental agency that permits or qualifies it to provide those services for which it is licensed or certificated.

(c) Any person or entity that is unable to show that it is subject to the jurisdiction of another agency of this or another state or the federal government, shall submit to an examination by the commissioner to determine the organization and solvency of the person or the entity, and to determine whether the person or entity is in compliance with the applicable provisions of this code, and shall be required to obtain a certificate of authority to do business in California and be required to meet all appropriate reserve, surplus, capital, and other necessary requirements imposed by this code for all insurers.

(d) Any person or entity unable to show that it is subject to the jurisdiction of another agency of this or another state or the federal government shall be subject to all appropriate provisions of this code regarding the conduct of its business.

(e) The department shall prepare and maintain for public inspection a list of those persons or entities described in subdivision (a) that are not subject to the jurisdiction of another agency of this or another state or the federal government and that the department knows to be operating in this state. There shall be no liability of any kind on the part of the state, the department, and its employees for the accuracy of the list or for any comments made with respect to it.

(f) Any administrator licensed by the department who advertises or administers coverage in this state described in subdivision (a), that is provided by any person or entity described in subdivision (c), and where the coverage does not meet all pertinent requirements specified in this code and that is not provided or completely underwritten, insured or otherwise fully covered by an admitted life or disability insurer, hospital service plan or health care service plan, shall advise and disclose to any purchaser, prospective purchaser, covered person or entity, and any production agency licensed by the department involved in the transaction, all financial and operational information relative to the content and scope of the plan and, specifically, as to the lack of insurance or other coverage.

Any production agency obtaining knowledge of any coverage relative to the content and scope of a hospital service plan or health care service plan, as required under this subdivision, shall advise and disclose to any purchaser, prospective purchaser, covered person or entity, the knowledge regarding the content and scope of the plan and, specifically, as to the lack of insurance by an admitted carrier or other qualified plan.

(g) A health care service plan, as defined in Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, shall not be subject to this section.

(h) The department shall notify, in writing, the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care whenever it determines that a multiple employer trust qualifies as a health care service plan subject to Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(i) Any health care service plan, including a self-insured reimbursement plan that pays for or reimburses any part of the cost of health care services, operated by any city, county, city and county, public entity, or political subdivision, or a public joint labor management trust as described in subdivision (c) of Section 1349.2 of the Health and Safety Code, that is exempt pursuant to Section 1349.2 of the Health and Safety Code from the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code), is also exempt from this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 857, Sec. 53.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

742.

(a) Any person or other entity that provides coverage in this state for medical, surgical, chiropractic, physical therapy, speech pathology, audiology, professional mental health, dental, hospital, or optometric services, whether this coverage is by direct payment, reimbursement, or otherwise, and that enters into an arrangement or contract with, or underwrites, a preferred provider organization or arrangement subject to Section 10133 is subject to the jurisdiction of the Department of Insurance.

(b) Any person or entity subject to regulation under Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code shall not be subject to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 100, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

742.1.

(a) Any person or other entity or arrangement in this state that is organized for the purpose of offering or providing coverage in this state, for the benefit of employees of two or more employers, for medical, surgical, chiropractic, physical therapy, speech pathology, audiology, professional mental health, dental, hospital, or optometric services, whether that coverage is by direct payment, reimbursement, or otherwise, is subject to the jurisdiction of the department.

(b) Any person or entity subject to regulation under Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code shall not be subject to the provisions of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 640, Sec. 1.   Effective August 16, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.7. Multiple Employer Welfare Arrangements [742.20. - 742.43.]

742.20.

The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(a) An alternative to insurance programs, health care maintenance organizations, and panel provider organizations was established by Congress in 1974 through the Employee Retirement Income Security Act (ERISA). Among the various employee benefit programs established and governed by ERISA are multiple employer welfare arrangements (MEWA), which are subject as well to state regulatory and fiscal standards not inconsistent with ERISA. MEWAs permit employer members of trade associations to create trust funds for the purpose of offering and providing health care benefits to their employees. MEWAs can be created as fully insured or self-funded or partially self-funded benefit programs.

(b) The Legislature recognizes that some MEWAs provide an alternative mechanism to traditional health insurance for small employers. It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure the financial integrity of those MEWA programs that are already in existence by requiring self-funded or partially self-funded MEWAs to obtain a certificate of compliance from the Department of Insurance. In order for the Department of Insurance to grant a certificate of compliance, the MEWA must adhere to standards set forth in this act which are not inconsistent with the provisions of ERISA. Further, it is the intent of the Legislature to provide the Department of Insurance with the authority to levy monetary penalties and to revoke certificates of compliance from MEWAs that violate the provisions of this act.

(c) The Legislature has passed significant reforms in the area of small group health insurance. This article, in no manner, circumvents these reforms nor is it intended to be a precedent to do so. Therefore, the small group reform legislation applies to MEWAs to the extent it is not inconsistent with ERISA.

(d) The provisions of this article are consistent with and authorized by ERISA, which confers upon the states limited authority to regulate MEWAs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1082, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

742.21.
